Florida, session 2026, SB726.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 17 18 Section 1.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 19 252.35, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 20 252.35âEmergency management powers; Division of Emergency 21 Management.â 22 (2)âThe division is responsible for carrying out the 23 provisions of ss. 252.31-252.90. In performing its duties, the 24 division shall: 25 (a)âPrepare a state comprehensive emergency management 26 plan, which must be integrated into and coordinated with the 27 emergency management plans and programs of the Federal 28 Government. The division shall adopt the plan as a rule in 29 accordance with chapter 120. The plan must be implemented by a 30 continuous, integrated comprehensive emergency management 31 program. The plan must contain provisions to ensure that the 32 state is prepared for emergencies and minor, major, and 33 catastrophic disasters, and the division shall work closely with 34 local governments and agencies and organizations with emergency 35 management responsibilities in preparing and maintaining the 36 plan. The state comprehensive emergency management plan must be 37 operations oriented and: 38 1.âInclude an evacuation component that includes specific 39 regional and interregional planning provisions and promotes 40 intergovernmental coordination of evacuation activities. This 41 component must, at a minimum: contain guidelines for lifting 42 tolls on state highways; ensure coordination pertaining to 43 evacuees crossing county lines; set forth procedures for 44 directing people caught on evacuation routes to safe shelter; 45 establish strategies for ensuring sufficient, reasonably priced 46 fueling locations along evacuation routes; and establish 47 policies and strategies for emergency medical evacuations. 48 2.âInclude a shelter component that includes specific 49 regional and interregional planning provisions and promotes 50 coordination of shelter activities between the public, private, 51 and nonprofit sectors. This component must, at a minimum: 52 contain strategies to ensure the availability of adequate public 53 shelter space in each county; establish strategies for refuge 54 of-last-resort programs; provide strategies to assist local 55 emergency management efforts to ensure that adequate staffing 56 plans exist for all shelters, including medical and security 57 personnel; provide for a postdisaster communications system for 58 public shelters; establish model shelter guidelines for 59 operations, registration, inventory, power generation 60 capability, information management, and staffing; and set forth 61 policy guidance for sheltering people with special needs. 62 3.âInclude a postdisaster response and recovery component 63 that includes specific regional and interregional planning 64 provisions and promotes intergovernmental coordination of 65 postdisaster response and recovery activities. This component 66 must provide for postdisaster response and recovery strategies 67 according to whether a disaster is minor, major, or 68 catastrophic. The postdisaster response and recovery component 69 must, at a minimum: establish the structure of the stateâs 70 postdisaster response and recovery organization; establish 71 procedures for activating the stateâs plan; set forth policies 72 used to guide postdisaster response and recovery activities; 73 describe the chain of command during the postdisaster response 74 and recovery period; describe initial and continuous 75 postdisaster response and recovery actions; identify the roles 76 and responsibilities of each involved agency and organization; 77 provide for a comprehensive communications plan; establish 78 procedures for coordinating and monitoring statewide mutual aid 79 agreements reimbursable under federal public disaster assistance 80 programs; provide for rapid impact assessment teams; ensure the 81 availability of an effective statewide urban search and rescue 82 program coordinated with the fire services; ensure the existence 83 of a comprehensive statewide medical care and relief plan 84 administered by the Department of Health; and establish systems 85 for coordinating volunteers and accepting and distributing 86 donated funds and goods. 87 4.âInclude additional provisions addressing aspects of 88 preparedness, response, recovery, and mitigation as determined 89 necessary by the division. 90 5.âAddress the need for coordinated and expeditious 91 deployment of state resources, including the Florida National 92 Guard. In the case of an imminent major disaster, procedures 93 should address predeployment of the Florida National Guard, and, 94 in the case of an imminent catastrophic disaster, procedures 95 should address predeployment of the Florida National Guard and 96 the United States Armed Forces. 97 6.âEstablish a system of communications and warning to 98 ensure that the stateâs population and emergency management 99 agencies are warned of developing emergency situations, 100 including public health emergencies, and can communicate 101 emergency response decisions. 102 7.âEstablish guidelines and schedules for annual exercises 103 that evaluate the ability of the state and its political 104 subdivisions to respond to minor, major, and catastrophic 105 disasters and support local emergency management agencies. Such 106 exercises shall be coordinated with local governments and, to 107 the extent possible, the Federal Government. 108 8.âAssign lead and support responsibilities to state 109 agencies and personnel for emergency support functions and other 110 support activities. 111 9.âInclude the public health emergency plan developed by 112 the Department of Health pursuant to s. 381.00315. 113 10.âInclude an update on the status of the emergency 114 management capabilities of the state and its political 115 subdivisions. The update must include the emergency management 116 capabilities related to public health emergencies, as determined 117 in collaboration with the Department of Health. 118 11.âEvaluate the integration of supplemental weather data 119 and advanced forecasting products under s. 252.396 and the 120 effects on forecast accuracy, early warning systems, and 121 resilience outcomes. 122 123 The complete state comprehensive emergency management plan must 124 be submitted to the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the 125 House of Representatives, and the Governor on February 1 of 126 every even-numbered year. 127 Section 2.âSection 252.396, Florida Statutes, is created to 128 read: 129 252.396âIntegration of supplemental weather observational 130 data and advanced forecasting.â 131 (1)âAs used in this section the term: 132 (a)ââAdvanced forecasting productsâ means tools, models, or 133 services that provide greater precision, accuracy, and more 134 timely predictions than services offered by the Federal 135 Government. 136 (b)ââSupplemental weather observational dataâ means 137 meteorological, hydrological, or atmospheric information 138 collected from sources other than the Federal Government. 139 (2)âThe division shall, within available resources and in 140 coordination with federal, state, and local partners: 141 (a)âIntegrate supplemental weather observation data and 142 advanced forecasting products into emergency management decision 143 making. The division shall identify and prioritize areas where 144 such data and products will most improve forecast accuracy and 145 public safety through partnerships, data sharing, or 146 infrastructure development. 147 (b)âEstablish standards to use when evaluating supplemental 148 weather data and procedures for the use of such data for 149 emergency management. 150 (c)âPromote the use of supplemental weather data. 151 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.